en: Multimedia & Design Software
xx: Multimedia & Design Software
cs: Multimediální software
da: Multimedie- og designsoftware
de: Software für Multimedia & Design
es: Software de diseño y multimedia
fr: Graphisme et multimédia
it: Software contenuti multimediali e progettazione
ja: マルチメディアソフト
nl: Software voor multimedia en design
no: Multimedie- og designprogramvare
pl: Programy do multimediów i projektowania
pt: Software de multimídia e design
ru: Программное обеспечение для дизайна и обработки мультимедиа
sv: Program för multimedia och design
tr: Multimedya ve Tasarım Yazılımları

en: 3D Modeling Software
cs: CAD software
da: Software til 3D-modellering
de: Software zur Erstellung von 3D-Modellen
es: Software de modelado 3D
fr: Logiciels de modélisation 3D
it: Software di modellazione 3D
ja: 3Dモデリングソフト
nl: 3D-modeleersoftware
no: 3D-modelleringsprogramvare
pl: Programy do modelowania 3D
pt: Software de modelagem 3D
ru: Программное обеспечение для трехмерного моделирования
sv: Program för 3D-modellering
tr: 3B Modelleme Yazılımları

en: Animation Editing Software
xx: Animation Editing Software
cs: Software pro úpravu animací
da: Software til animering
de: Animationsbearbeitungssoftware
es: Software de edición de animación
fr: Éditeurs d'animations
it: Software di animazione
ja: アニメーション編集ソフト
nl: Software voor animatiebewerking
no: Programvare for animasjonsredigering
pl: Programy do edycji animacji
pt: Software para edição de animação
ru: ПО для обработки файлов анимации
sv: Program för animationsredigering
tr: Animasyon Hazırlama Yazılımları

en: Graphic Design & Illustration Software
xx: Graphic Design & Illustration Software
cs: Software pro grafický design a kreslení
da: Software til grafisk design og illustration
de: Graphic-Design-Software
es: Software de diseño gráfico
fr: Logiciels de traitement d'image
it: Software progettazione grafica
ja: グラフィックデザインソフト
nl: Software voor grafisch ontwerp
no: Programvare for grafisk design og illustrasjoner
pl: Programy graficzne i ilustracyjne
pt: Software de design gráfico
ru: Программное обеспечение дя графического дизайна
sv: Program för grafisk design och illustrationer
tr: Grafik Tasarım ve İllüstrasyon Yazılımları

en: Home & Interior Design Software
xx: Home & Interior Design Software
cs: Software pro navrhování domů a interiérů
da: Software til indretning af hjemmet
de: Software zur Innenraumgestaltung
es: Software de diseño de hogar e interiores
fr: Logiciels de décoration d'intérieur
it: Software per home e interior design
ja: ホーム・インテリアデザインソフト
nl: Software voor woninginrichting en interieurdesign
no: Programvare for hjem- og interiørdesign
pl: Programy do projektowania wnętrz
pt: Software de design de interiores
ru: Программное обеспечение для дизайна интерьеров
sv: Program för hem- och interiördesign
tr: Ev ve İç Tasarım Yazılımları

en: Home Publishing Software
xx: Home Publishing Software
cs: Publikační software pro domácnost
da: Software til publicering for private
de: Home-Publishing-Software
es: Software de edición no profesional
fr: Logiciels de publication
it: Software home publishing
ja: ホームパブリッシングソフト
nl: Software voor desktoppublishing
no: Hjemmepubliseringsprogramvare
pl: Domowe programy DTP
pt: Software de publicação doméstico
ru: Программное обеспечение для домашнего издательства
sv: Program för hemmapublicering
tr: Ev Yayıncılığı Yazılımları

en: Media Viewing Software
xx: Media Viewing Software
cs: Software pro přehrávání médií
da: Software til visning af medier
de: Software zur Medienwiedergabe
es: Software multimedia
fr: Logiciels de lecture multimédia
it: Software visualizzazione multimediale
ja: メディアプレイヤー
nl: Software voor mediaweergave
no: Medievisningsprogramvare
pl: Programy do odtwarzania multimediów
pt: Software de visualização multimídia
ru: Программное обеспечение для просмотра мультимедиа
sv: Program för mediavisning
tr: Medya Görüntüleme Yazılımları

en: Music Composition Software
xx: Music Composition Software
cs: Software pro skládání hudby
da: Software til musikproduktion
de: Software für Musikkomposition
es: Software de composición musical
fr: Création musicale
it: Software composizione musicale
ja: 作曲ソフト
nl: Software voor componeren van muziek
no: Programvare for musikkomponering
pl: Programy do komponowania muzyki
pt: Software para composição de música
ru: Программное обеспечение для создания музыки
sv: Program för musikframställning
tr: Müzik Besteleme Yazılımları

en: Sound Editing Software
xx: Sound Editing Software
cs: Software na úpravu zvuku
da: Software til lydredigering
de: Tonbearbeitungssoftware
es: Software de edición de sonido
fr: Montage audio
it: Software per montaggio audio
ja: 音声編集ソフト
nl: Software voor geluidsbewerking
no: Lydredigeringsprogramvare
pl: Programy do obróbki dźwięku
pt: Software de edição de som
ru: Программное обеспечение для обработки звука
sv: Program för ljudredigering
tr: Ses Montaj Yazılımları

en: Video Editing Software
xx: Video Editing Software
cs: Software pro střih videa
da: Software til videoredigering
de: Videobearbeitungssoftware
es: Software de edición de vídeo
fr: Logiciels de montage vidéo
it: Software montaggio video
ja: 動画編集ソフト
nl: Videobewerkingssoftware
no: Videoredigeringsprogramvare
pl: Programy do obróbki wideo
pt: Software para edição de vídeos
ru: Программное обеспечение для обработки видео
sv: Program för videoredigering
tr: Görüntü Montaj Yazılımları

en: Web Design Software
xx: Web Design Software
cs: Software pro navrhování webových stránek
da: Software til webdesign
de: Web-Design-Software
es: Software de diseño web
fr: Logiciels de création de sites Web
it: Software per grafica web
ja: ウェブデザインソフト
nl: Software voor webdesign
no: Webdesign-programvare
pl: Programy do tworzenia stron www
pt: Software de webdesign
ru: Программное обеспечение для веб-дизайна
sv: Program för webbdesign
tr: Web Tasarımı Yazılımları

en: Network Software
xx: Network Software
cs: Síťový software
da: Netværkssoftware
de: Netzwerksoftware
es: Software de red
fr: Logiciels réseau
it: Software di rete
ja: ネットワークソフト
nl: Netwerksoftware
no: Nettverksprogramvare
pl: Programy sieciowe
pt: Software de rede
ru: Сетевое программное обеспечение
sv: Nätverksprogramvara
tr: Ağ Yazılımları

en: Office Application Software
xx: Office Application Software
cs: Kancelářský software
da: Kontorsystemer
de: Büroanwendungssoftware
es: Software de aplicaciones ofimáticas
fr: Logiciels bureautiques
it: Software applicativo per ufficio
ja: オフィスアプリケーション
nl: Kantoorsoftware
no: Programvare til kontorbruk
pl: Programy biurowe
pt: Software de aplicativo de escritório
ru: Офисное программное обеспечение
sv: Kontorspaket
tr: Ofis Uygulama Yazılımları

en: Operating Systems
xx: Operating Systems
cs: Operační systémy
da: Operativsystemer
de: Betriebssysteme
es: Sistemas operativos
fr: Systèmes d'exploitation
it: Sistemi operativi
ja: オペレーティングシステム
nl: Besturingssystemen
no: Operativsystemer
pl: Systemy operacyjne
pt: Sistemas operacionais
ru: Операционные системы
sv: Operativsystem
tr: İşletim Sistemleri

en: Restore Disks
xx: Restore Disks
cs: Disky pro obnovení systému
da: Gendannelsesdiske
de: Wiederherstellungsdatenträger
es: Discos de restauración
fr: Disques de restauration
it: Dischi di ripristino
ja: リカバリーディスク
nl: Herstelschijven
no: Gjenopprettingsdisker
pl: Dyski ratunkowe
pt: Discos de restauração
ru: Диски для восстановления системы
sv: Återställningsdiskar
tr: Geri Yükleme Diskleri

en: Digital Goods & Currency
xx: Digital Goods & Currency
cs: Digitální obsah a měna
da: Digitale varer og valuta
de: Digital-Content-Software
es: Bienes y moneda digitales
fr: Biens et monnaie virtuels
it: Software contenuti digitali
ja: デジタルコンテンツ・仮想通貨
nl: Software voor digitale inhoud
no: Digitale varer og valuta
pl: Towary i waluty cyfrowe
pt: Software de conteúdo digital
ru: Цифровые товары и валюта
sv: Digitala varor och valutor
tr: Dijital Ürünler ve Elektronik Para

en: Computer Icons
xx: Computer Icons
cs: Počítačové ikony
da: Computerikoner
de: Computer-Icons
es: Iconos de ordenador
fr: Icônes d'ordinateur
it: Icone computer
ja: アイコン
nl: Computerpictogrammen
no: Datamaskin-ikoner
pl: Ikony
pt: Ícones para computador
ru: Компьютерные значки
sv: Datorikoner
tr: Bilgisayar Simgeleri

en: Desktop Wallpaper
xx: Desktop Wallpaper
cs: Tapety na plochu
da: Skrivebordstapeter
de: Desktop-Hintergrundbilder
es: Fondo de pantalla
fr: Fonds d'écran
it: Sfondo desktop
ja: デスクトップ壁紙
nl: Bureaubladachtergrond
no: Skrivebordsbakgrunner
pl: Tapety pulpitu
pt: Papéis de parede para computador
ru: Обои для рабочего стола
sv: Skrivbordsbakgrunder
tr: Masaüstü Duvar Kağıtları

en: Digital Artwork
xx: Digital Artwork
cs: Digitální výtvarná díla
da: Digitale kunstværker
de: Digitales Bildmaterial
es: Arte digital
fr: Illustrations numériques
it: Opere d'arte digitali
ja: デジタル アート
nl: Digitale kunst
no: Digital kunst
pl: Cyfrowe prace plastyczne
pt: Arte digital
ru: Произведения цифрового искусства
sv: Digigrafi
tr: Dijital Sanat Eseri

en: Document Templates
xx: Document Templates
cs: Šablony dokumentů
da: Dokumentskabeloner
de: Dokumentvorlagen
es: Plantillas de documentos
fr: Modèles de documents
it: Modelli di documenti
ja: 文書テンプレート
nl: Documentsjablonen
no: Dokumentmaler
pl: Szablony dokumentów
pt: Modelos de documentos
ru: Шаблоны документов
sv: Dokumentmallar
tr: Belge Şablonları